District of Columbia statutes.
44-1507

Provisions effective throughout District.

The provisions of §§ 44-1501 to 44-1507 shall be general within the boundaries of the District of Columbia.

June 21, 1870, 16 Stat. 159, ch. 135, § 7
Age of majority, establishment, see § 46-101.
1981 Ed., § 32-907.
1973 Ed., § 32-207.